Maryland, session 2025, HB0868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0868*

HOUSE BILL 868
Article – Estates and Trusts
7–402.
(a) (1) The personal representative may petition the court for permission to
act in any matter relating to the administration of the estate.
(2) (I) 1. A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO HAS POWER OF
ATTORNEY OR WHOM A DECEDENT ALSO NAMED AS THE DECEDENT’S CAREGIVER
MAY PETITION THE COURT TO INTERPRET A WILL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTENT
OF THE DECEDENT IF:
A. THE WILL CONTAINS A LEGACY FOR A HEALTH
PROVIDER OR CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IN THE HEALTH SECTOR; AND
B. THE WILL DOES NOT EXPRESSLY PROVIDE THAT THE
LEGACY MUST BE USED TO ADDRESS HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES EVEN THOUGH THE
DECEDENT’S LIFE REFLECTED AN ACTIVE INTEREST IN HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES.
2. A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO PETITIONS A
COURT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL PRESENT EVIDENCE SATISFACTORY TO THE
COURT, INCLUDING EVIDENCE OF ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE DECEDENT DURING THE
DECEDENT’S LIFETIME, TO DEMONSTRATE THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT UNDER
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH THAT THE LEGACY TO THE HEALTH PROVIDER OR
CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION IN THE HEALTH SECTOR MUST BE USED TO ADDRESS
HEALTH EQUITY ISSUES.
(II) A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE’S PRESENTATION OF
EVIDENCE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL
CREATE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION AS TO THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT AND,
UNLESS EVIDENCE IS PRESENTED TO REBUT THE PRESUMPTION, THE COURT SHALL
INTERPRET THE WILL IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT.
(III) THE COURT SHALL DEFER TO THE JUDGMENT OF THE
PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE REGARDING THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE WILL
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE WILL INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING LANGUAGE:
“IN ADDITION TO THE POWERS CONFERRED UPON PERSONAL
REPRESENTATIVES AND TRUSTEES BY LAW, MY REPRESENTATIVE AND TRUSTEE, OR
ANY DULY APPOINTED SUCCESSOR, SHALL HAVE AUTHORITY WITHOUT
ADJUDICATION OR ORDER OR DIRECTION OF THE COURT TO:
(1) SELL, PURSUANT TO OPTION OR OTHERWISE, AT A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE SALE AND UPON SUCH TERMS AS THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE SHALL

HOUSE BILL 868 3
DEEM BEST, ANY REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY BELONGING TO MY ESTATE
WITHOUT REGARD TO THE NECESSITY OF SUCH SALE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PAYING
DEBTS, TAXES, OR LEGACIES;
(2) RETAIN ANY AND ALL OF SUCH PROPERTY NOT SO REQUIRED
WITHOUT LIABILITY FOR ANY DEPRECIATION THEREOF;
(3) ASSIGN OR TRANSFER CERTIFICATES OF STOCK, BONDS, OR
OTHER SECURITIES;
(4) ADJUST, COMPROMISE, AND SETTLE ANY AND ALL CLAIMS IN
FAVOR OF OR AGAINST MY ESTATE;
(5) CONDUCT AND CARRY ON ALL BUSINESS UNTIL SUCH TIME AS THE
BUSINESS CAN BE SOLD AND DISTRIBUTED AS A GOING CONCERN OR OTHERWISE,
AND THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE SHALL BE EXONERATED FROM ANY LOSS
WHICH MAY RESULT THEREBY; AND
(6) DO ANY AND ALL THINGS NECESSARY AND PROPER TO COMPLETE
THE ADMINISTRATION OF ALL MY ESTATE AS FULLY AS I COULD DO IF I WERE
LIVING.”.
(IV) THE JUDGMENT OF A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE THAT A
COURT IS REQUIRED TO DEFER TO UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH:
1. INCLUDES ANY ACT TO ADDRESS HEALTH DISPARITY;
AND
2. SHALL BE CONSIDERED AUTHORIZED BY LAW UNLESS
THERE IS COMPELLING EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE IS
ACTING:
A. CONTRARY TO THE INTENT OF THE DECEDENT; AND
B. WITH INTENT TO COMMIT FRAUD AGAINST THE
ESTATE.
(V) THE PROVISION DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO ENSURE THAT:
1. ALL INDIVIDUALS WITH POWERS OF ATTORNEY OR
NAMED AS CAREGIVERS BY THE DECEDENT DURING THE DECEDENT’S LIFETIME ARE

HOUSE BILL 868
HELD ACCOUNTABLE AND PROTECTED; AND
2. A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH HOLDS AN INTERESTED PERSON ACCOUNTABLE FOR THEIR ACTIONS
OR INACTIONS TOWARD, RELATED TO, IN HONOR OF, OR ON BEHALF OF THE
DECEDENT.
(VI) 1. FOR THE PERIOD BEGINNING 6 MONTHS AFTER THE
PROBATE OF THE ESTATE AND ENDING 3 YEARS AFTER THE PROBATE OF THE
ESTATE, A PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE WHO PETITIONS THE COURT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY REQUIRE A LEGATEE DESCRIBED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1A OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO DEMONSTRATE HOW THE
LEGACY WAS USED BY THE LEGATEE.
2. IF THE LEGATEE FAILS TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE
LEGACY WAS USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERPRETATION OF THE WILL
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE
MAY PETITION THE COURT TO ISSUE:
A. AN ORDER REQUIRING THE BENEFICIARY TO RETURN
THE LEGACY TO THE ESTATE; OR
B. A JUDGMENT REQUIRING THE LEGATEE TO PAY THE
ESTATE THE VALUE OF THE LEGACY.
(b) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
court may pass any order it considers proper.
(2) IN A PROCEEDING UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COURT MAY PASS ANY ORDER IT CONSIDERS:
(I) PROPER; AND
(II) CONSISTENT WITH THE GUIDANCE IN SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
1–102.

HOUSE BILL 868 5
IT IS THE POLICY OF THE STATE TO OPPOSE AND ALLEVIATE ANY DISPARITY
IN HEALTH OUTCOMES FOR AND AMONG RACIAL GROUPS IN THE STATE RESULTING
FROM THE PROVISION OF TREATMENT OTHERWISE AVAILABLE TO ASSIST THE
PUBLIC IN GENERAL, AND TO ENCOURAGE AND SUPPORT THE MAKING OF GIFTS AND
BEQUESTS CONSISTENT WITH THIS POLICY TO ADDRESS AND ALLEVIATE SUCH
HEALTH DISPARITIES.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall be
construed to apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any will
probated on or after October 1, 2021.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.